South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3539.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a hospital licensed in this State may not charge uninsured patients fees for services rendered that are in excess of the maximum fees charged for the same services rendered to insured patients. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----